test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_luuhad_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - luuhâđ: # MLO checked; also imperative checked
    luuhâđ+V+Inf: luuhâđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuṿâm
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luuṿah
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loˊhá
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lohheen
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luhâvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luuhâv
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luuhâp
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luhâvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: loˊheh
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luuhim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luuhih
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luuṿâi
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: luuṿáim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: luuṿáid
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: luuṿáin
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luuṿâim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luuṿâid
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luhhii
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: luṿâččim
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: luṿâččih
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: luṿâččij
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du1: luṿâččáim
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du2: luṿâččáid
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du3: luṿâččáin
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: luṿâččijm
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: luṿâččijd
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: luṿâččii
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: lohheem
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: lohheeh
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: luuṿâš
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du1: luṿâžeen
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du2: luuṿâšvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du3: luṿâžává
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: luṿâžep
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: luuṿâšvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: luṿâžeh
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: lohhoom 
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: luuṿâ
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: loˊṿos
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: lohhoon
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: lohhee
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: lohhoos
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: luhhup
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: luuhâđ
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: lohhoos
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luuṿâ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: luṿâččii
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: luuṿii
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Neg: luuṿâ
    luuhâđ+V+PrsPrc: lohhee
    luuhâđ+V+PrfPrc: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Actio: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Ess: luhâmin
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Loc: luhâmist
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Ill: luhâmân
    luuhâđ+V+Ger: luṿâdijn
    luuhâđ+V+VAbess: luṿâhánnáá


  Verb - njaahâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative should be added
    njaahâđ+V+Inf: njaahâđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaaṿâm
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njaaṿah
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njááhá
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: njähheen
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: njahâvettee
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: njaahâv
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: njaahâp
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njahâvetteđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njäähih
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njaahim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njaahih
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njaaṿâi
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: njaaṿáim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: njaaṿáid
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njaaṿáin
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: njaaṿâim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njaaṿâid
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njahhii
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: njaṿâččim
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: njaṿâččih
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: njaṿâččij
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du1: njaṿâččáim
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du2: njaṿâččáid
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du3: njaṿâččáin
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: njaṿâččijm
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: njaṿâččijd
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: njaṿâččii
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: njähheem
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: njähheeh
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: njaaṿâš
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du1: njaṿâžeen
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du2: njaaṿâšvettee
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du3: njaṿâžává
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: njaṿâžep
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: njaaṿâšvetteđ
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: njaṿâžeh
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: njáhhoom
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: njaaṿâ
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: njááṿus
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: njáhhoon
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: njähhee
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: njááhus
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: njááhup
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: njaahâđ
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: njááhus
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njaaṿâ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: njaṿâččii
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: njaavii
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Neg: njaaṿâ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njaṿâččii
    njaahâđ+V+PrsPrc: njähhee
    njaahâđ+V+PrfPrc: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Actio: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Ess: njahâmin
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Loc: njahâmist
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Ill: njahâmân
    njaahâđ+V+Ger: njaṿâdijn
    njaahâđ+V+VAbe: njaṿâhânnáá

  Verb - kiessâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative added
    kiessâđ+V+Inf: kiessâđ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâm
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kiesah
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiäṣá
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kiesˊseen
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kieˊṣâvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kiessâv
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kiessâp
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kieˊṣâvetteđ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kieṣih
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kiessim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kiessih
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kiesâi
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kiesáim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kiesáid
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kiesáin
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kiesâim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kiesâid
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kiessii
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kieˊsâččim
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kieˊsâččih
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kieˊsâččij
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Du1: kieˊsâččáim
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Du2: kieˊsâččáid
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Du3: kieˊsâččáin
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kieˊsâččijm
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kieˊsâččijd
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kieˊsâččii
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kiesˊseem
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kiesˊseeh
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kiesâš
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Du1: kieˊsâžeen
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Du2: kiesâšvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Du3: kieˊsâžává
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kieˊsâžep
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kiesâšvetteđ
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kieˊsâžeh
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kiäsˊsoom
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kiesâ
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kiäˊsus
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kiäsˊsoon
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kiesˊsee
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kiässus
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kiässup
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kiessâđ
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kiässus
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiesâ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kieˊsâččii
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: [kiesii, kiesˊsii]
    kiessâđ+V+PrsPrc: kiesˊsee
    kiessâđ+V+PrfPrc: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Actio: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kieṣâmin
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kieṣâmist
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kieṣâmân
    kiessâđ+V+Ger: kieˊsâdijn
    kiessâđ+V+VAbess: kieˊsâhánnáá

  Verb - moonnâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative added
    moonnâđ+V+Inf: moonnâđ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moonâm
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: moonah
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maṇâ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: manneen
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: moṇâvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: moonnâv
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: moonnâp
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: moṇâvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: maṇeh
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: moonnim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: moonnih
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: moonâi
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: moonáim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: moonáid
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: moonáin
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: moonâim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: moonâid
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: monnii
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: monâččim
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: monâččih
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: monâččij
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du1: monâččáim
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du2: monâččáid
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du3: monâččáin
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: monâččijm
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: monâččijd
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: monâččii
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: maaneem
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: maaneeh
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: moonâš
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du1: monâžeen
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du2: moonâšvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du3: monâžává
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: monâžep
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: moonâšvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: monâžeh
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: mannoom
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: moonâ
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: maṇos
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: mannoon
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: mannee
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: mannoos
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: mannoop
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: moonnâđ
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: mannoos
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: moonâ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: monâččii
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: moonii
    moonnâđ+V+PrsPrc: mannee
    moonnâđ+V+PrfPrc: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Actio: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Ess: moṇâmin
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Loc: moṇâmist
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Ill: moṇâmân
    moonnâđ+V+Ger: monâdijn
    moonnâđ+V+VAbess: monâhánnáá

  Verb - viiššâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative added
    viiššâđ+V+Inf: [viiššâđ, viššâđ]
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viišâm
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viišah
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viṣ̌á
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viššeen
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: viṣ̌âvettee
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: viiššâv
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viiššâp
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viṣ̌âvetteđ
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viṣ̌eh
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viiššim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viišših
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viišâi
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: viišáim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: viišáid
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: viišáin
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viišâim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viišâid
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viššii
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: višâččim
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: višâččih
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: višâččij
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Du1: višâččáim
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Du2: višâččáid
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Du3: višâččáin
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: višâččijm
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: višâččijd
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: višâččii
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: viišeem
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: viišeeh
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: viišâš
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Du1: višâžeen
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Du2: viišâšvettee
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Du3: višâžává
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: višâžep
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: viišâšvetteđ
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: višâžeh
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: viššoom
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: viišâ
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: višos
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: viššoon
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: viššee
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: viššoos
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: viššoop
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [viiššâđ, viššâđ] 
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: viššoos
    viissâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viišâ
    viissâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: viiššâm
    viissâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: višâččii
    viissâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: [viišii, viššii]
    viiššâđ+V+PrsPrc: viššee
    viiššâđ+V+PrfPrc: [viiššâm, viššâm]
    viiššâđ+V+Actio: [viiššâm, viššâm]
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Ess: viṣ̌âmin
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Loc: viṣ̌âmist
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Ill: viṣ̌âmân
    viiššâđ+V+Ger: višâdijn
    viiššâđ+V+VAbess: višâhánnáá
